California, session 20252026, SB1333.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3640 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3640. (a) A naturopathic doctor may order and perform physical and laboratory examinations for diagnostic purposes, including, but not limited to, phlebotomy, clinical laboratory tests, speculum examinations, orificial examinations, and physiological function tests.(b) A naturopathic doctor may order diagnostic imaging studies, including X-ray, ultrasound, mammogram, bone densitometry, and others, consistent with naturopathic training as determined by the board, but shall refer the studies to an appropriately licensed health care professional to conduct the study and interpret the results.(c) A naturopathic doctor may dispense, administer, order, prescribe, and furnish or perform the following:(1) Food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals, enzymes, botanicals and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, all dietary supplements, and nonprescription drugs as defined by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) consistent with the routes of administration identified in subdivision (d).(2) Hot or cold hydrotherapy; naturopathic physical medicine inclusive of the manual use of massage, stretching, resistance, or joint play examination but exclusive of small amplitude movement at or beyond the end range of normal joint motion; electromagnetic energy; colon hydrotherapy; and therapeutic exercise.(3) Devices, including, but not limited to, therapeutic devices, barrier contraception, and durable medical equipment.(4) Health education and health counseling.(5)Repair and care incidental to superficial lacerations and abrasions, except suturing.(6)Removal of foreign bodies located in the superficial tissues.(5) Minor office procedures. For purposes of this paragraph, “minor office procedure” means any of the following:(A) Care and operative procedures relative to lacerations, skin lesions, and abrasions.(B) The incision and drainage of abscesses.(C) The trephination of subungual hematomas.(D) The removal of foreign bodies.(E) The topical and parenteral use of local anesthetic solutions, their adjuncts, and diluents.(F) Obtaining samples of superficial human tissue by means of biopsy, consistent with the practice of naturopathic medicine.(d) A naturopathic doctor may utilize routes of administration that include oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal, transdermal, intradermal, subcutaneous, intravenous, and intramuscular.(e) The board may establish regulations regarding ocular or intravenous routes of administration that are consistent with the education and training of a naturopathic doctor.(f) Nothing in this section shall exempt a naturopathic doctor from meeting applicable licensure requirements for the performance of clinical laboratory tests, including the requirements imposed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200).SEC. 2. Section 3640.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3640.5.Nothing in this chapter or any other law shall be construed to prohibit a naturopathic doctor from furnishing or ordering drugs when all of the following apply:(a)The drugs are furnished or ordered by a naturopathic doctor in accordance with standardized procedures or protocols developed by the naturopathic doctor and their supervising physician and surgeon.(b)The naturopathic doctor is functioning pursuant to standardized procedure, as defined by subdivisions (a), (b), (d), (e), (h), and (i) of Section 2836.1 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2836.1, or protocol. The standardized procedure or protocol shall be developed and approved by the supervising physician and surgeon, the naturopathic doctor, and, where applicable, the facility administrator or their designee.(c)The standardized procedure or protocol covering the furnishing of drugs shall specify which naturopathic doctors may furnish or order drugs, which drugs may be furnished or ordered under what circumstances, the extent of physician and surgeon supervision, the method of periodic review of the naturopathic doctor’s competence, including peer review, and review of the standardized procedure.(d)The furnishing or ordering of drugs by a naturopathic doctor occurs under physician and surgeon supervision. Physician and surgeon supervision shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the physician, but does include all of the following:(1)Collaboration on the development of the standardized procedure.(2)Approval of the standardized procedure.(3)Availability by telephonic contact at the time of patient examination by the naturopathic doctor.(e)For purposes of this section, a physician and surgeon shall not supervise more than four naturopathic doctors at one time. (f)Drugs furnished or ordered by a 3640.5. (a) A naturopathic doctor may include Schedule III through furnish, order, or prescribe drugs, including, but not limited to, any of the following, provided they comply with the requirements of subdivision (b):(1) Legend drugs, including Schedule II to Schedule V V, inclusive, controlled substances under the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code) and shall be further limited to those drugs agreed upon by the naturopathic doctor and physician and surgeon as specified in the standardized procedure. When Schedule III controlled substances, as defined in Section 11056 of the Health and Safety Code, are furnished or ordered by a naturopathic doctor, the controlled substances shall be furnished or ordered in accordance with a patient-specific protocol approved by the treating or supervising physician. A copy of the section of the naturopathic doctor’s standardized procedure relating to controlled substances shall be provided upon request, to a licensed pharmacist who dispenses drugs, when there is uncertainty about the naturopathic doctor furnishing the order. Code).(2) Epinephrine to treat anaphylaxis.(3) Natural and synthetic hormones.(4) Vitamins, minerals, amino acids, glutathione, botanicals and their extracts, homeopathic medicines, electrolytes, sugars, and diluents that may be administered utilizing routes of administration, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3640, only when such substances are chemically identical to those for sale without a prescription. (g)(b) The board has certified that the naturopathic doctor has satisfactorily completed adequate coursework in pharmacology covering the drugs to be furnished or ordered under this section. The board shall establish the requirements for satisfactory completion of this subdivision.(h)(c) Use of the term “furnishing” in this section, in health facilities defined in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (i) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, shall include both of the following:(1)Ordering ordering or furnishing a drug in accordance with the standardized procedure.(2)Transmitting an order of a supervising physician and surgeon. (i)(d) For purposes of this section, “drug order” or “order” means an order for medication which is dispensed to or for an ultimate user, issued by a naturopathic doctor as an individual practitioner, within the meaning of Section 1306.02 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(j)(e) Notwithstanding any other law, both of the following apply:(1)A drug order issued pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as a prescription of the supervising physician. (2)(1) All references to prescription in this code and the Health and Safety Code shall include drug orders issued by naturopathic doctors.(3)(2) The signature of a naturopathic doctor on a drug order issued in accordance with this section shall be deemed to be the signature of a prescriber for purposes of this code and the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 3. Section 3640.7 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.3640.7.Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 3640.5 or any other provision of this chapter, a naturopathic doctor may independently prescribe and administer the following:(a)Epinephrine to treat anaphylaxis.(b)Natural and synthetic hormones.(c)Vitamins, minerals, amino acids, glutathione, botanicals and their extracts, homeopathic medicines, electrolytes, sugars, and diluents that may be administered utilizing routes of administration, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3640, only when such substances are chemically identical to those for sale without a prescription.SEC. 4. Section 3686 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3686. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, ____, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 11150 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11150. No person other than a physician, dentist, podiatrist, or veterinarian, or naturopathic doctor acting pursuant to Section 3640.7 3640.5 of the Business and Professions Code, or pharmacist acting within the scope of a project authorized under Article 1 (commencing with Section 128125) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 107 or within the scope of Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6 of the Business and Professions Code, a registered nurse acting within the scope of a project authorized under Article 1 (commencing with Section 128125) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 107, a certified nurse-midwife acting within the scope of Section 2746.51 of the Business and Professions Code, a nurse practitioner acting within the scope of Section 2836.1 of the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant acting within the scope of a project authorized under Article 1 (commencing with Section 128125) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 107 or Section 3502.1 of the Business and Professions Code, a naturopathic doctor acting within the scope of Section 3640.5 of the Business and Professions Code, or an optometrist acting within the scope of Section 3041 of the Business and Professions Code, or an out-of-state prescriber acting pursuant to Section 4005 of the Business and Professions Code shall write or issue a prescription.